Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.850

Challenge of registration—Forms, availability.

The secretary of state must provide forms for voter registration challenges, and the county auditor must make such forms available. A challenge is not required to be submitted on the provided voter challenge form, but may be prepared using an official electronic voter challenge form template provided by the auditor or secretary of state that has been printed and signed by the challenger for submission.

[ 2006 c 320 s 7; 2003 c 111 s 257; 1991 c 81 s 27; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 35; 1965 ex.s. c 156 s 4. Formerly RCW 29.10.150.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.